Illinois, session 104th, SB2367.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Pacific Conflict Stress Test Act. 6    Section 5. Purpose. The purpose of this Act is to prepare 7and secure the State in order to minimize the disruptive 8impact of a potential conflict precipitated by foreign 9adversaries against allies, democratic countries, and the 10United States Armed Forces in the Pacific theater. 11    Section 10. Definitions.In this Act:12    "Critical infrastructure" means systems and assets, 13whether physical or virtual, so vital to the State or the 14United States of America that the incapacity or destruction of 15such systems and assets would have a debilitating impact on 16State or national security, State or national economic 17security, State or national public health, or any combination 18of those matters. A critical infrastructure may be publicly or 19privately owned, and includes, but is not limited to:20    (1) gas and oil production, storage, or delivery systems;21    (2) water supply, refinement, storage, or delivery 22systems;  SB2367- 2 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1    (3) telecommunications networks;2    (4) electrical power delivery systems;3    (5) emergency services;4    (6) transportation systems and services; or5    (7) personal data or otherwise classified information 6storage systems, including cybersecurity.7    "Critical procurements" means those acquisitions made by 8the State, any agency, political subdivision, or private 9nongovernmental organization critical to the proper 10functioning of critical infrastructure or to the health, 11safety, or security of the State or the United States.12    "Divestment" means the sale, forfeit, or otherwise 13contractual end of any current or planned ownership or control 14of assets.15    "Investment" means any transfer of funds into any active 16or passive, direct or indirect structure that seeks to 17generate revenue or accomplish any other gain, including 18non-monetary gains.19    "Pacific conflict" means a declared war or armed conflict 20between the United States or any of her allies and another 21nation that occurs in the land, sea, or air area of the Pacific 22Ocean and threatens or could reasonably escalate to threaten 23the supply chains, critical infrastructure, safety, or 24security of the State or the United States.25    "Pacific conflict" includes a serious deterioration of 26diplomatic ties or economic engagement between the United   SB2367- 3 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1States or its allies and another nation that threatens the 2status quo of Pacific trade, travel, and military operations 3or exercises.4    "State-managed fund" means any short-term or long-term 5investment structure that is State-managed, State-run, 6State-controlled, or otherwise overseen by the State, a State 7agency, or any political subdivision within the State or 8agency controlled by the same, in which the State or 9subdivision has primary discretion over or vested interest in. 10Nothing in this definition shall be construed so as to not 11apply to any fund that is subject to the purview or direction 12of the State or applicable subdivision, and populated, wholly 13or in part, with State funds, but managed by a third-party 14entity, such as a fiduciary. This shall include, but is not 15limited to:16        (1) public pension funds, public retirement funds, or 17    other State-sponsored funds, that is sponsored, 18    maintained, or contributed to or required to be 19    contributed to by the State or any locality within the 20    State, or any subsidiaries of such;21        (2) municipal, county, or other local or municipal 22    entity investment funds, "rainy day funds," or other 23    political subdivision-controlled investment structures; 24    and25        (3) university or college endowments, trusts, or other 26    structure that constitutes, wholly or in part, a public   SB2367- 4 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1    institution of higher education's investable assets. 2    "State-owned enterprise" means any company owned or 3controlled, in whole or in part, by a government or by 4individuals acting in official government capacities in any 5form.6    "State risk assessment" means a study conducted under the 7Governor in consultation with the General Assembly that 8leverages the expertise of executive agencies and that 9minimally includes: an identification of threats and hazards 10that could negatively impact citizens and assets of the State; 11a preparation of risk scenarios, describing cause and 12consequence of threats and hazards that might actualize to 13impact citizens and assets of the State; and an analysis of the 14probability and severity of the consequences associated with 15each risk scenario.16    "State supply chain" means the end-to-end process for 17shipping goods, purchased by the State, for the State, 18beginning at the point of origin through a point or points of 19distribution to the destination.20    "State vendor supply chain" means the end-to-end process 21for shipping goods, purchased by the State from State vendors, 22to the vendors, beginning at the point of origin through a 23point or points of distribution to the destination. 24    Section 15. Statement of policy.25    (a) It is the policy of the State to support the civilian   SB2367- 5 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1and military command of the United States of America and its 2efforts to promote and maintain prosperity, peace and security 3for the United States and its allies. It is the policy of the 4State to enhance the defensive posture of the State to protect 5the State citizens and assets and to contribute to the broader 6defensive posture of the United States of America by reducing 7security vulnerabilities within the State.8    (b) It is the policy of the State to exercise foresight and 9make reasonable preparations for a potential regional or 10global conflict centered on the Pacific theater that could 11involve attacks upon the United States and her allies in the 12Pacific theater, that could involve asymmetrical attacks on 13the United States homeland, and that could cause the 14disruption or complete severing of supply chains between the 15State and its vendors and the People's Republic of China, the 16Republic of China, or other countries in the Pacific theater. 17    Section 20. State risk assessment.18    (a) The Governor shall produce and publish a State risk 19assessment no later than the day before the annual address 20made to the General Assembly by the Governor, and annually 21thereafter.22    (b) The State risk assessment shall include all 23substantial risks to State or national security, State or 24national economic security, State or national public health, 25or any combination of those matters, occurring within and   SB2367- 6 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1threatening the State. 2    Section 25. Audit of State supply chains, State vendor 3supply chains, and State investment holdings.4    (a) The Auditor General shall conduct an audit of all 5critical procurements purchased or supplied through a State 6supply chain or State vendor supply chain, and produce and 7publish a report, which shall be submitted to the General 8Assembly and the Governor and made easily accessible to the 9public, within 180 days after the effective date of this Act.10    (b) This report shall identify:11        (1) all critical procurements produced in or by a 12    foreign adversary, a State-owned enterprise of a foreign 13    adversary, a company domiciled within a foreign adversary, 14    or a company owned by a company domiciled within a foreign 15    adversary;16        (2) all critical procurements manufactured in 17    countries or by companies at risk of disruption in the 18    event of a Pacific conflict; and19        (3) all critical procurements sourced from any country 20    or company that uses Pacific supply chain processes at 21    risk of disruption in the event of a Pacific conflict. 22    (c) This report shall recommend alternative sourcing, if 23available; highlight the difficulty in identifying potential 24alternative sourcing, if relevant; and specify the level of 25risk to the State associated with such a disruption in   SB2367- 7 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1sourcing for each procurement that is threatened in the event 2of a Pacific conflict.3    The Auditor General shall conduct an audit of all funds 4managed by the State government and any political subdivision 5of the State and produce and publish a report, which shall be 6submitted to General Assembly and the Governor and made easily 7accessible to the public, within 180 days after the effective 8date of this Act.9    (d) This audit report shall identify all investments:10        (1) at risk of substantially losing value or being 11    frozen, seized, or appropriated by foreign adversaries in 12    the event of a Pacific conflict;13        (2) all investments in any arms industry of a foreign 14    adversary;15        (3) all investments in State-owned enterprises of a 16    foreign adversary;17        (4) all investments in companies domiciled within a 18    foreign adversary or owned by a company domiciled within a 19    foreign adversary.20     The audit report shall recommend strategies for the 21immediate and complete divestment of these assets identified 22in subsection (b). 23    Section 30. Creation of the Select Committee on Pacific 24Conflict.25    (a) The Select Committee on Pacific Conflict is created.  SB2367- 8 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1    (b) Appointments to the Select Committee shall be 2finalized within 60 days after the effective date of this Act.3    (c) The first meeting of the Select Committee shall be 4within 90 days after the effective date of this Act.5    (c) The Select Committee shall meet no less than once 6every 3 months, with additional regular meetings at the call 7of the majority of the Select Committee and emergency meetings 8at the call of the Chair of the Select Committee or the 9Governor.10    (d) A report on the impact of a Pacific conflict on the 11State, insofar as it has been completed, shall be submitted to 12the General Assembly, the Governor, and be made easily 13accessible to the public no later than 30 days before the 14annual address made to the General Assembly by the Governor, 15and an updated report made available pursuant to the same on an 16annual basis.17    The first report shall incorporate the findings of the 18audit of State supply chains, State vendor supply chains, and 19State investment holdings established in Section 25, along 20with the report on adversarial threats to state assets and 21critical infrastructure established in Section 35 and due no 22later than 30 days before the first annual address made to the 23General Assembly by the Governor after the conclusion of the 24Commission on Adversarial Threats to State Assets and Critical 25Infrastructure.26    (e) The Select Committee shall be authorized for an   SB2367- 9 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1initial period of 3 years.2    (f)(1) The Select Committee shall consist of 9 members, 3one of whom shall act as the Chair of the Select Committee and 4one of whom shall act as the Vice Chair of the Select 5Committee.6    (2) The Governor shall appoint the following members to 7the Select Committee: 8        (A) The Chair of the Select Committee. The Chair of 9    the Select Committee shall have applicable knowledge of 10    the threats posed to the State in the event of a Pacific 11    conflict and the research and leadership experience to 12    competently and comprehensively produce the report 13    required by this Act. The Chair of the Select Committee 14    shall have applicable knowledge of the threats posed to 15    the State in the event of a Pacific conflict and the 16    research and leadership experience to competently and 17    comprehensively produce the report required by this Act.18        (B) The Director of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 19    or the Director's designee.20        (C) The Adjutant General or his or her or designee.21        (D) The Director of the Illinois State Police or the 22    Director's designee.23        (E) The Director of the Illinois Emergency Management 24    Agency and Office of Homeland Security or the Director's 25    designee.26    (3) The Senate President, Senate Minority Leader, Speaker   SB2367- 10 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1of the House, and House Minority Leader shall each appoint a 2member to the Select Committee. The Senate President's 3appointee shall serve as the Vice Chair of the Select 4Committee. These members shall have applicable knowledge of 5the threats posed to the State in the event of a Pacific 6conflict.7    (g) At the discretion of the Select Committee on Pacific 8Conflict, an advisory board may be retained to provide 9expertise and collaborative research support.10    (h) Members shall not be entitled to compensation but may 11be reimbursed for travel and other expenses incurred in the 12performance of official duties of the Select Committee.13    (i) Advisory board members, if any, shall not be entitled 14to compensation but may be reimbursed for travel and other 15expenses incurred in the performance of duties to the Select 16Committee.17    (i)(1) As specified under subsection (d), the Select 18Committee on Pacific Conflict shall annually produce a report 19concerning the threats posed to the State in the event of a 20Pacific conflict.21    (2) This report shall provide a comprehensive risk 22assessment, including all identified vulnerabilities and 23recommended mitigation and emergency response strategies, as 24each pertains to a Pacific conflict, to each the following 25identified areas and any other areas deemed appropriate or 26applicable by the Select Committee:  SB2367- 11 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1        (A) critical infrastructure;2        (B) telecommunications infrastructure;3        (C) military installations located within the State;4        (D) State supply chain for critical procurements;5        (E) State vendor supply chain for critical 6    procurements;7        (F) State cybersecurity;8        (G) public safety and security; and9        (H) public health.10    (j) The Select Committee may subpoena and consult experts, 11conduct field investigations, hold hearings, receive testimony 12in any form or format, work with federal officials, request or 13require the production of documents and other evidence, and 14otherwise take any lawful action to carry out the purposes set 15forth in this Act.16    (k) Closed hearings of the Select Committee may be 17conducted, but only to the extent necessary, notwithstanding 18the requirement that the Select Committee make every effort to 19provide the most information and transparency possible in the 20publicly published report.21    (l) The Select Committee may compel the cooperation and 22compliance of State agencies and nongovernmental organizations 23critical to the safety and security of the State to carry out 24the purposes set forth.25    (m) The Select Committee shall be provided sufficient 26legislative research and funding support to carry out this Act   SB2367- 12 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1and all requirements therein. 2    Section 35. Report on adversarial threats to State assets 3and critical infrastructure.4    (a) The Governor, in consultation with the Select 5Committee on Pacific Conflict, shall appoint a Director, who 6shall lead the study on adversarial threats to State assets 7and critical infrastructure and coordinate the research and 8development of the report, commencing within 30 days of the 9effective date of this Act.10    (b) Within 180 days of the effective date of this Act, the 11Director shall identify all critical infrastructure and other 12assets within the State that could reasonably be targeted in 13malicious actions by adversarial nations in the event of a 14Pacific conflict, and that, as a result of this malicious 15action, would result in a significant negative impact on the 16public health, safety, economic security, or physical security 17of the State and nation. In identifying critical 18infrastructure and other assets within the State for this 19purpose, the Director shall apply consistent, objective 20criteria. 21    (c) Within 365 days after the effective date of this Act, 22the Director shall produce a report that shall include:23        (1) identified critical infrastructure and other 24    assets under subsection (b), including the specific risks 25    posed to each infrastructure system or asset in the event   SB2367- 13 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1    of a Pacific conflict;2        (2) mitigation strategies and suggestions to limit or 3    eliminate the risk posed to the critical infrastructure or 4    other assets in the event of a Pacific conflict; and 5    mitigation strategies and suggestions that limit or 6    eliminate the risk posed to the safety and security of the 7    State or nation in the event of a Pacific conflict.8        (3) identified critical procurements in the audit 9    conducted consequent to Section 25 of this Act, including 10    the specific risks posed to each critical procurement in 11    the event of a Pacific conflict; and12        (4) mitigation strategies and suggestions, including 13    alternative sourcing, that limit or eliminate the risk 14    posed to the safety and security of the State or nation in 15    the event of a Pacific conflict.16    (d) The report described in subsection (c) shall include a 17risk-based list of critical infrastructure and other assets 18identified under subsection (b), the order of which shall be 19determined by:20        (1) the degree to which each critical infrastructure 21    system is in need of protective action; and22        (2) the degree to which the debilitation of each 23    critical infrastructure system would have on the safety 24    and security of the State and the nation.25    (e) The report shall include a risk-based list of 26components identified under subsection (c), but only for the   SB2367- 14 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1most at-risk components, that shall be determined by:2        (1) the degree to which the sourcing of each component 3    is at risk of disruption or restriction;4        (2) the degree to which the disruption or restriction 5    of sourcing would cause a debilitating effect on the 6    safety and security of the State and the nation; and7        (3) the difficulty in identifying alternative 8    manufacturers for sourcing or supply chain delivery for 9    the component.10    (f) The Director shall coordinate with the Select 11Committee on Pacific Conflict and other appropriate State 12agencies, and shall be provided with the resources necessary 13to produce the report. State agencies shall provide the 14Director with information necessary to carry out the 15responsibilities under this section. The Director shall 16develop a process for relevant stakeholders to submit 17information to assist in identifying critical infrastructure 18and other assets described under subsection (b).19    (g) The Director may also, at his or her discretion, 20coordinate with State universities of higher education, 21private firms specializing in infrastructure risk management, 22and federal agencies including, but not limited to, the 23Department of Defense, the Cybersecurity and Infrastructure 24Security Agency, the Director of National Intelligence, the 25National Security Agency, the Department of Homeland Security, 26and any other agency deemed appropriate by the Director.  SB2367- 15 -LRB104 03798 BDA 13822 b1    (h) The Director, in coordination with appropriate State 2agencies, shall confidentially notify owners and operators of 3critical infrastructure identified under subsection B of this 4Section that they have been so identified, and ensure owners 5and operators are provided the basis for the determination. 6The Director shall also establish a process through which 7owners and operators of critical infrastructure may submit 8relevant information and request reconsideration of 9assessments made under subsection (b). 10    Section 97. Severability. The provisions of this Act are 11severable under Section 1.31 of the Statute on Statutes.